Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5485YC (2) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.93, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 262.93 Reports to general assembly. 3 The college student aid commission and the state board of 4 regents each shall submit to the general assembly, by January 5 15 of each year, a report on the progress and implementation 6 of the programs which they administer under sections 256.214 7 through 256.217 and 262.92 . By January 31 of each year, the 8 state board of regents shall submit a report to the general 9 assembly regarding the progress and implementation of the 10 program administered pursuant to section 262.82 . The reports 11 shall include but are not limited to the numbers of students 12 and educators participating in the programs and allocation of 13 funds appropriated for the programs. 14 Sec. 2. REPEAL. Sections 262.81 and 262.82, Code 2026, are 15 repealed. 16